Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2623.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subarticle heading immediately preceding section 2001-B to read:SUBARTICLE AEDUCATIONAL IMPROVEMENT AND OPPORTUNITYSCHOLARSHIP TAX CREDIT PROGRAMSSection 2. Section 2005-B(a)(1), (a.1)(1), (b) and (c)(1) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended to 123456789101112131415161718192021 read:Section 2005-B. Tax credits.(a) Scholarship or educational improvement organizations.--In accordance with section 2006-B, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against any applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to a scholarship organization or educational improvement organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall not exceed [75% or, in the case of a contribution to the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools, 85%] 99% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm.* * *(a.1) Opportunity scholarship organizations.--In accordance with section 2006-B, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against any applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to an opportunity scholarship organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall not exceed [75%] 99% of the total amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm.* * *(b) Additional amount.--Notwithstanding subsections (a)(1) and (a.1)(1), in accordance with section 2006-B, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit of up to [90% or, in the case of a contribution to the scholarship organization for economically disadvantaged schools,] 99% of the total amount 20260HB2623PN3584 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contributed during the taxable year if the business firm provides a written commitment to provide the scholarship organization, educational improvement organization or opportunity scholarship organization with the same amount of contribution for two consecutive tax years. The business firm must provide the written commitment under this subsection to the department at the time of application.(c) Pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations.--In accordance with section 2006-B, the Department of Revenue shall grant a tax credit against any applicable tax to a business firm providing proof of a contribution to a pre-kindergarten scholarship organization in the taxable year in which the contribution is made in accordance with the following:(1) The tax credit shall be equal to 100% of the first $10,000 contributed during the taxable year by the business firm and shall not exceed [90%] 99% of the remaining amount contributed during the taxable year by the business firm. At the time of application, a business firm may provide a written commitment to the department to provide the pre-kindergarten scholarship organization with at least the same amount of contribution for two consecutive years.* * *Section 3. Section 2006-B(a)(1) of the act, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 2006-B. Limitations.(a) Amount.--(1) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to scholarship organizations, educational improvement organizations and pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall not exceed 20260HB2623PN3584 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [$590,000,000] $790,000,000 in a fiscal year. The following shall apply:(i) No less than [$375,000,000] $525,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to scholarship organizations.(ii) No less than $74,500,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to educational improvement organizations.(iii) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved for contributions from business firms to pre-kindergarten scholarship organizations shall not exceed [$30,500,000] $40,500,000 in a fiscal year.(iv) No less than [$110,000,000] $150,000,000 of the total aggregate amount shall be used to provide tax credits for contributions from business firms to increase the scholarship or pre-kindergarten scholarship by up to $2,000 or, in the case of a scholarship for a student attending a secondary school, by up to $4,000, for a student attending an economically disadvantaged school, to the extent that the total amount of scholarships, pre-kindergarten scholarships and opportunity scholarships will not exceed the lesser of $8,500 or the school's tuition.* * *Section 4. Article XX-B of the act is amended by adding subarticles to read:SUBARTICLE BPENNSYLVANIA LEARNING INVESTMENT TAX CREDIT20260HB2623PN3584 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2021-B. Scope of subarticle.This subarticle relates to the Pennsylvania Learning Investment Tax Credit.Section 2022-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible child." A child of school age who:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Has not yet received a high school diploma.(3) Currently resides within the attendance boundary of a public school.(4) Is eligible to attend a public school.(5) Is not enrolled in a public school for the taxable year."Nonpublic school." A school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, where a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241)."Public school." A school operated by a school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school or area career and technical school."Qualified learning expense." An expense incurred by a taxpayer that is a parent or legal guardian of an eligible child, including:(1) Tuition and fees at a nonpublic school.(2) Textbooks or curriculum materials.20260HB2623PN3584 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Fees for after-school or summer education programs provided by a nonpublic school.(4) Tutoring services.(5) Educational software and applications.(6) Fees for standardized and nationally recognized tests, including college admissions tests, advanced placement examinations and related preparatory courses.(7) Education services for students with disabilities from a licensed or accredited practitioner or education service provider.(8) Contracted services provided by a public school district, including specific classroom instruction."Tax credit." The Pennsylvania Learning Investment Tax Credit provided for under this subarticle."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Tax Reform Code of 1971." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Taxable year." As defined under section 301 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 2023-B. Credit for qualified learning expenses.(a) Creation of tax credit.--For each taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026, a taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 for each eligible child who is not enrolled in a public school for the taxable year to be used for qualified 20260HB2623PN3584 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 learning expenses.(b) Amount.--The tax credit under this section shall be $8,000 per child per taxable year.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim a tax credit under this section on a return filed under section 330 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(d) Tax credit refund.--The tax credit under this section shall be applied against the taxpayer's tax liability. If the tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability, the department shall issue a refund under the procedures specified in section 346 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(e) Distribution of tax credit.--(1) The department shall allow taxpayers to claim the tax credit when filing an annual tax return or through advanced installments.(2) The department shall prescribe applications for the purposes of claiming the tax credits in advance and a deadline by which applications for the advance shall be submitted.(3) A taxpayer shall choose to receive the tax credit:(i) as a direct deposit electronically to a banking account provided by the taxpayer; or(ii) by certified mail to a legal address.Section 2024-B. Regulations.The Secretary of Revenue may issue rules and promulgate regulations necessary to implement and administer this subarticle.SUBARTICLE CDISPLACED STUDENT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAMSection 2031-B. Definitions.20260HB2623PN3584 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A parent who applies for participation in the program under section 2033-B on behalf of an eligible student."Attendance boundary." As defined in section 2002-B."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Displaced student scholarship account." A spending account established and administered by the State Treasury and directed by a parent for a scholarship recipient that may be used for qualified education expenses and special education service fees to attend a participating nonpublic school."Displacement-impacted school." A public school that satisfies one of the following:(1) Is designated as an overcrowded school under section 2042-B.(2) Is scheduled for closure, consolidation or realignment by a school district pursuant to a facilities plan, restructuring plan or other official action by the school district."Eligible student." A school-age child who:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(2) Has not received a high school diploma.(3) Resides within the attendance boundary of a displacement-impacted school or resided within the attendance boundary of a displacement-impacted school at the time the State Treasury received written confirmation that the child accepted an offer of enrollment under section 2033-B.(4) Satisfies one of the following:20260HB2623PN3584 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Attended a public school in this Commonwealth in the preceding school year.(ii) Received a scholarship from the program in the preceding school year.(iii) Will attend kindergarten for the first time in the next school year."Fund." The Displaced Student Scholarship Fund established in section 2037-B."Instructional capacity." The sum of the room capacity of each instructional space in a school building."Instructional space." A room within a school building that is regularly used for classroom instruction of students, including a general education classroom, laboratory and alternative education classroom. The term shall not include a temporary or portable classroom."Kindergarten." A one-year formal educational program, whether part time or full time, that occurs during the school year immediately prior to first grade."Nonpublic school." Any school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, where a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Ch. 21 Subch. V (relating to federally assisted programs)."Parent." An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and:(1) has legal custody or guardianship of an eligible student; or(2) keeps in the individual's home an eligible student and supports the student gratis as if the student were a 20260HB2623PN3584 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lineal descendant of the individual."Participating nonpublic school." A nonpublic school offering a program of instruction for kindergarten through grade twelve, or a combination of grades, that:(1) notifies the State Treasury of the nonpublic school's desire to participate in the program; and(2) provides certification to the State Treasury that the nonpublic school meets the criteria under section 2040-B(a)."Program." The Displaced Student Scholarship Program established under section 2032-B."Public school." A school operated by a school district, an intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school."Qualified education expense." An expense incurred by a parent of an eligible student, including:(1) Tuition, fees, books, supplies and other equipment incurred in connection with enrollment or attendance of an eligible student at a nonpublic school.(2) Academic tutoring incurred in connection with attendance of an eligible student at a nonpublic school.(3) Uniforms, transportation and supplementary items and services required or provided by a nonpublic school in connection with enrollment or attendance.(4) Online learning supports and computer technology, equipment or services used in connection with attendance of an eligible student at a nonpublic school.(5) Dual enrollment tuition and fees.(6) College preparatory activities, including admissions testing and application fees.20260HB2623PN3584 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Other student supports, including special needs services from a licensed or accredited practitioner or education service provider."Resident school district." The school district in which an eligible student resides."Scholarship." A scholarship that is awarded to an eligible student under the program."Scholarship recipient." An eligible student who is awarded a scholarship under the program."School-age child." A child enrolling in kindergarten or in grades one through twelve."School year." A school term as defined in section 102."Special education services fee." A fee charged by a participating nonpublic school for special education services for a student with special needs as agreed to by the parent and the participating nonpublic school."State Treasury." The Treasury Department of the Commonwealth."Student with special needs." A child who is subject to an individualized education program under 20 U.S.C. Ch. 33 (relating to education of individuals with disabilities) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs).Section 2032-B. Displaced Student Scholarship Program.(a) Establishment.--Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the Displaced Student Scholarship Program is established as a program in the State Treasury to provide scholarships to help eligible students pay qualified education expenses and special education services fees for attendance at a participating nonpublic school.20260HB2623PN3584 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Notice to parents.--(1) By October 1, and each October 1 thereafter, a school district shall notify the parent of a student who is attending or residing within the attendance boundary of the displacement-impacted school during the school year of the school's designation.(2) The notice shall be in a form provided by the State Treasury, in consultation with the department, and shall provide the following information regarding the program:(i) A description of the program.(ii) Instructions for obtaining information about applying for a scholarship under the program.(iii) A list of any school in the school district that has been designated as a displacement-impacted school and the reason for the designation.(iv) Notice of the parent's responsibilities regarding application to a participating nonpublic school if the parent seeks to enroll an eligible student in a participating nonpublic school.(3) The notice shall be posted on the school district's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Notice to State Treasury.--A school district required to submit a notice to parents under subsection (b) shall provide the State Treasury with a list of students whose parents were provided the notice. The notification shall be made in a manner and form established by the State Treasury.Section 2033-B. Application.(a) Application form.--No later than 30 days after the effective date of this section, the State Treasury shall develop an application form that can be accessed from and submitted 20260HB2623PN3584 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronically on the State Treasury's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Application and approval process.--(1) No later than February 1, 2027, and each February 1 thereafter, an applicant may apply to the State Treasury for a scholarship for the following school year according to guidelines developed by the State Treasury under section 2038-B. An application shall be approved by the State Treasury if the student meets the eligibility requirements of this subarticle.(2) A renewal application shall be approved by the State Treasury if the student meets the eligibility requirements of this article, notwithstanding the residence or income criteria specified in paragraph (3) of the definition of "eligible student" in section 2031-B.(3) A parent may appeal the State Treasury's decision regarding nonapproval of an application. The appeal shall be governed by 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 1 (relating to general provisions), 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and 7 (relating to judicial review).(4) No later than April 1, 2027, and each April 1 thereafter, the State Treasury shall notify the applicant whether a scholarship will be awarded for the following school year.(5) For the 2027-2028 school year, scholarships shall be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis considering money available in the fund.(6) For the 2028-2029 school year, and each school year thereafter, the State Treasury shall give priority for scholarships to prior year scholarship recipients, and shall 20260HB2623PN3584 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 award scholarships to new applicants on a first-come, first-served basis considering money available in the fund.(7) Upon notification by the State Treasury that a scholarship has been awarded, the applicant shall apply for enrollment of the scholarship recipient directly to the participating nonpublic school under an application procedure developed by the participating nonpublic school.(8) No later than June 1, 2027, and each June 1 thereafter, a participating nonpublic school shall provide written confirmation to the State Treasury of scholarship recipients who have accepted an offer of enrollment for the following school year and provide the State Treasury with the amounts to be charged to the scholarship recipient for qualified education expenses and special education services fees. The notification shall be made in a manner and form established by the State Treasury.(9) The State Treasury may establish a waiting list for eligible students with approved applications who did not receive awards due to availability of money in the fund and, if, by July 1, 2027, and by July 1 each year thereafter, additional money is available in the fund for scholarships, may award scholarships to the eligible students on a first-come, first-served basis.Section 2034-B. Agreement.(a) Authorization.--Upon receipt of written confirmation that a scholarship recipient has accepted an offer of enrollment under section 2033-B, the State Treasury must enter into or renew an agreement with the applicant. The agreement shall provide the following:(1) The scholarship recipient shall enroll in a 20260HB2623PN3584 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participating nonpublic school for the school year for which the agreement applies.(2) A certain sum of money shall be deposited into a displaced student scholarship account under section 2035-B on behalf of the scholarship recipient.(3) The money in the displaced student scholarship account may be expended only as authorized under this article.(4) The parent shall notify the State Treasury if the scholarship recipient no longer resides in this Commonwealth or withdraws or is forced to withdraw from the participating nonpublic school within 15 days of the change of residency or withdrawal.(b) Term of agreement.--Except as otherwise provided under this article, an agreement entered into under subsection (a) shall be valid for one school year.(c) Termination.--(1) An agreement entered into under subsection (a) may be terminated early by the parent for any reason.(2) An agreement entered into under subsection (a) shall be terminated by the State Treasury for any of the following reasons:(i) The parent is found to have engaged in fraudulent misuse of the displaced student scholarship account. In such case, the scholarship recipient shall be ineligible for future participation in the program. The parent may appeal the State Treasury's decision regarding termination and student eligibility within 30 days of issuance of the decision. The appeal shall be governed by 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 1 (relating to general provisions), 5 20260HB2623PN3584 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to practice and procedure) and 7 (relating to judicial review).(ii) The scholarship recipient no longer resides in this Commonwealth.(iii) The scholarship recipient withdraws or is forced to withdraw from a participating nonpublic school prior to the completion of the school year.(3) If an agreement is terminated under this subsection:(i) All available money in the displaced student scholarship account shall revert to the fund.(ii) The participating nonpublic school shall repay to the State Treasury for deposit into the fund the full amount of the scholarship payment, reduced on a pro rata basis by the tuition, qualified education expenses and special education services fees owed for the portion of the school year in which the scholarship recipient was enrolled.(iii) The participating nonpublic school may not require the parent to reimburse the participating nonpublic school for the amount of the scholarship returned to the State Treasury.(d) Renewal.--An agreement entered into under subsection (a) may be renewed for each school year for the same student.(e) Multiple agreements.--A parent of more than one child who is a scholarship recipient must enter into a separate agreement under subsection (a) for each of the children.(f) Explanation.--Upon entering into an agreement under subsection (a) or renewing an agreement under subsection (d), the State Treasury shall provide the parent with a written explanation of the authorized uses of the money in the displaced 20260HB2623PN3584 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student scholarship account.Section 2035-B. Displaced student scholarship account.(a) Establishment.--If an agreement is entered into under section 2034-B(a), the State Treasury shall establish a displaced student scholarship account for the scholarship recipient. The displaced student scholarship account shall be administered by the State Treasury in accordance with this article.(b) Deposit.--(1) Upon establishment of a displaced student scholarship account, the State Treasury shall deposit a sum of money for the applicable school year in the displaced student scholarship account for the scholarship recipient in accordance with this section.(2) For the 2027-2028 school year, the sum shall be as follows:(i) for a student in half-day kindergarten, $2,500;(ii) for a student in full-day kindergarten through grade eight, $5,000;(iii) for a student in grades nine through twelve, $10,000; or(iv) for a student with special needs regardless of grade level, $15,000.(3) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, and each school year thereafter, the amounts in paragraph (2) shall be increased by the greater of the average percentage increase in the index as defined in section 302 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, for all school districts for the prior school year and the percentage increase in the appropriation for 20260HB2623PN3584 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 basic education for the prior fiscal year. The State Treasury shall calculate the increases on an annual basis and shall submit a notice of the increases to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Installments.--The State Treasury shall deposit the money for each scholarship into a displaced student scholarship account on a schedule determined by the State Treasury in consultation with the department.(d) Payments to participating nonpublic schools.--A parent may direct payments from the displaced student scholarship account to a participating nonpublic school on behalf of the scholarship recipient via an electronic money transfer system or other method approved by the State Treasury under section 2038-B.Section 2036-B. Qualified education expenses.(a) Authorized use.--Money deposited into a displaced student scholarship account may be used only to pay for qualified education expenses and special education service fees incurred by or associated with the scholarship recipient.(b) Prohibition.--A participating nonpublic school that receives a payment for qualified education expenses authorized under subsection (a) may not refund, rebate or otherwise directly share any portion of the payment with the parent who made the payment.(c) Tax consequences and status of awards.--(1) The money in a displaced student scholarship account is not taxable income to the parent or scholarship recipient under State law.(2) An award made to, or payment from, a displaced 20260HB2623PN3584 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student scholarship account may not be construed to be an appropriation or financial assistance to a participating nonpublic school.Section 2037-B. Displaced Student Scholarship Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Displaced Student Scholarship Fund is established in the State Treasury. All interest and earnings received from investment or deposit of the money in the fund shall be paid into the fund and used for scholarships. Any unexpended money and interest or earnings on the money in the fund may not be transferred or revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.(b) Funding.--The fund shall consist of the following:(1) Money that is appropriated, given, granted or donated by the Commonwealth or any other government or private agency or person for the purpose established under this article.(2) An amount equal to $50,000,000, which shall be transferred from the General Fund to the fund no later than 15 days after the effective date of this section and each August 1 thereafter.(c) Continuing appropriation.--The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the State Treasury for scholarships.Section 2038-B. Duties of State Treasury.(a) List of duties.--The State Treasury shall:(1) Develop guidelines, in consultation with the department, as necessary for the administration of this article.(2) Make payments to displaced student scholarship accounts as provided in this article.20260HB2623PN3584 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Develop a system that enables a parent to direct payment to a participating nonpublic school in accordance with this article.(4) Develop a process by which a nonpublic school may inform the State Treasury of the nonpublic school's interest to participate in the program and demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this article.(5) Ensure that eligible students and their parents are informed annually of the participating nonpublic schools in the program by posting a list of participating nonpublic schools on the State Treasury's publicly accessible Internet website no later than January 1, 2027, and by January 1 of each year thereafter.(6) At such time and in such form and manner as determined by the State Treasury, request and receive information and data from a public school, resident school district, participating nonpublic school or applicant determined to be necessary by the State Treasury to administer this article.(b) Third-party administration.--The State Treasury may contract with a third party to administer the program.(c) Contracting.--(1) Notwithstanding any provision of 62 Pa.C.S. Pt. I (relating to Commonwealth Procurement Code) to the contrary and in order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, a contract may be awarded for a supply or service without competition if the State Treasury determines in writing that the contract is necessary for the implementation of any provision of this article and is in the best interest of the Commonwealth. The State Treasury shall provide and 20260HB2623PN3584 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 make publicly available a written justification of any procurement under this section.(2) Paragraph (1) shall expire no later than two years following the issuance of the procurement under paragraph (1). Procurements issued after that period shall occur in accordance with other applicable law.(d) Regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, regulations determined to be necessary and promulgated by the State Treasury shall be deemed temporary regulations and shall expire no later than two years following the publication of temporary regulations. The State Treasury may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The authority provided to the State Treasury to adopt temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. Regulations adopted after that period shall be promulgated as provided by law.Section 2039-B. Auditor General powers.20260HB2623PN3584 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Auditor General may:(1) Conduct a random audit of displaced student scholarship accounts.(2) Refer cases of suspected fraudulent misuse of displaced student scholarship accounts to the Inspector General for investigation. If the investigation results in a finding that rises to the level of criminal activity, the Inspector General shall refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency for prosecution.(3) Notify the State Treasury of cases of suspected fraudulent misuse that are referred to the Inspector General.Section 2040-B. Duties of participating nonpublic schools.(a) Notification requirement.--A nonpublic school that desires to participate in the program shall notify the State Treasury by a date and in a manner and form established by the State Treasury. The notification shall include certification by the nonpublic school that:(1) The nonpublic school is a nonprofit entity exempt from Federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).(2) The nonpublic school complies with the nondiscrimination policies specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1981 (relating to equal rights under the law).(3) The nonpublic school complies with the provisions of sections 111 and 111.1.(b) Prohibition.--A participating nonpublic school may not charge a displaced student scholarship recipient a tuition rate, student-related fees or special education services fees that are higher than the rates the participating nonpublic school would have charged to a student who had not received a displaced 20260HB2623PN3584 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student scholarship.(c) Reporting requirements.--(1) A participating nonpublic school shall report in a manner and form determined by the State Treasury, in consultation with the department, information regarding scholarship recipients enrolled in the participating nonpublic school as follows:(i) Enrollment and disenrollment.(ii) Regular attendance.(iii) Chronic absenteeism.(iv) Academic progress as measured by advancement to the next grade level.(v) Indication of graduation.(vi) Concurrent or dual enrollment course credits.(2) The State Treasury shall report the information regularly to the department on a schedule agreed to by the State Treasury and the department.(d) Construction.--(1) For purposes of this article, a participating nonpublic school shall be autonomous and is not an agent of the State Treasury, the department or the Commonwealth.(2) Neither the State Treasury, the department nor other State agency may regulate the educational program of a participating nonpublic school that accepts money from a scholarship recipient beyond what is necessary to administer the program.Section 2041-B. Bar of certain participating nonpublic schools.(a) Authority to State Treasury.--The State Treasury may bar a nonpublic school from participation in the program if the State Treasury establishes that the nonpublic school has:20260HB2623PN3584 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) routinely failed to comply with the requirements established in section 2040-B; or(2) failed to provide a scholarship recipient with the educational services funded by the recipient's displaced student scholarship account.(b) Notice.--If the State Treasury bars a nonpublic school from participation in the program, the State Treasury shall, after any appeal is concluded and the State Treasury's decision is upheld under subsection (c), post the decision on the State Treasury's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Appeal.--A nonpublic school may appeal the State Treasury's decision to bar its participation in the program within 30 days of issuance of the decision. The appeal shall be governed by 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 1 (relating to general provisions), 5 (relating to practice and procedure) and 7 (relating to judicial review).Section 2042-B. Duties of resident school districts.(a) Overcrowded schools.--A school district shall designate a school as an overcrowded school when the utilization rate calculated under subsection (b) exceeds 102.5% of the instructional capacity of the school.(b) Calculation.--In making a designation under subsection (a), a school district shall calculate the utilization rate of each school as follows:(1) Divide the total student enrollment at the school by the instructional capacity of the school building.(2) Multiply the result of paragraph (1) by 100.(c) School records.--A resident school district shall provide a participating nonpublic school that has admitted a scholarship recipient with a complete copy of the scholarship 20260HB2623PN3584 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recipient's school record within 10 days of the receipt of notice from the participating nonpublic school of the scholarship recipient's enrollment.Section 2043-B. Report.(a) Duty to prepare and submit.--Beginning January 31, 2028, and each January 31 thereafter, the State Treasury, in consultation with the department, shall prepare and submit to the General Assembly an annual report on the program.(b) Contents.--The report shall include the following:(1) The total number of applications received for the program.(2) The total number of applications received for the program, by resident school district.(3) The total number of applications approved for the program.(4) The total number of applications approved for the program, by resident school district.(5) The total number of displaced student scholarship accounts terminated early.(6) The total number of displaced student scholarship accounts investigated for fraud by the Inspector General.(7) The total number of scholarships awarded to students attending half-day kindergarten.(8) The total number of scholarships awarded to students attending full-day kindergarten through grade eight.(9) The total number of scholarships awarded to students attending grades nine through twelve.(10) The total dollar amount of scholarships awarded.(11) The total number of applications not approved due to lack of funding.20260HB2623PN3584 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) The cost of administration of the program.(13) Other information the State Treasury deems helpful to the General Assembly.SUBARTICLE DCOMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL TAX CREDITSection 2051-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.Section 2052-B. Compliance with Federal tax credit for contributions to scholarship organizations.(a) Designated agency.--In accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 25F(g)(1)(B) (relating to qualified elementary and secondary education scholarships), the department shall make elections on behalf of the Commonwealth with respect to Federal tax benefits related to contributions of individuals to scholarship granting organizations.(b) Notice.--By October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter, the secretary shall transmit a notice to the United States Secretary of the Treasury opting into the Federal tax credit for contributions of individuals to scholarship granting organizations as required under 26 U.S.C. § 25F. The notice shall include a list of the scholarship organizations located in this Commonwealth that meet the requirements for a scholarship granting organization under 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(5).(c) Submission of information.--To assist the department in 20260HB2623PN3584 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determining if a scholarship organization meets Federal requirements under 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(5), each scholarship organization shall submit the following information to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, by June 1, 2026, and each June 1 thereafter:(1) Proof that the scholarship organization:(i) is exempt from Federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.); and(ii) maintains one or more separate accounts exclusively for qualified contributions in order to prevent the comingling of qualified contributions with other amounts.(2) Certification by the scholarship organization that the scholarship organization complies with all of the following:(i) Provides scholarships to 10 or more students who do not all attend the same school.(ii) Spends not less than 90% of the income of the scholarship organization on scholarships for eligible students.(iii) Does not provide scholarships for any expenses other than qualified elementary or secondary education expenses as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 530(b)(3)(A) (relating to Coverdell education savings accounts).(iv) Provides a scholarship to eligible students with a priority for:(A) students awarded a scholarship the previous school year; and(B) after application of clause (A), eligible 20260HB2623PN3584 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 students who have a sibling who was awarded a scholarship from the scholarship organization.(v) Does not earmark or set aside contributions for scholarships on behalf of any particular student.(vi) Verifies the annual household income and family size of an eligible student who applies for a scholarship to ensure that the student meets the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(2)(A) and limits the awarding of a scholarship to an eligible student who is a member of a household for which the income does not exceed the amount established under 26 U.S.C. § 25F(c)(2)(A).(vii) Does not award a scholarship to any disqualified person as determined under the rules of 26 U.S.C. § 4946(a) (relating to definitions and special rules).Section 2053-B. Compliance status.(a) Notification.--By September 1, 2026, and each September 1 thereafter, the department shall notify each scholarship organization of its compliance status and whether the scholarship organization will be included on the official list submitted to the United States Secretary of the Treasury under subsection (b).(b) Compliance.--After a scholarship organization is initially determined to be compliant under this subarticle, the scholarship organization shall be deemed compliant and remain on the list submitted to the United States Secretary of the Treasury each year.(c) Audits.--The department may perform random audits to ensure that a scholarship organization remains compliant with this section.20260HB2623PN3584 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Removal.--If the department determines that a scholarship organization is not compliant with this section, the department may remove the scholarship organization from the list submitted to the United States Secretary of the Treasury.Section 2054-B. Guidelines.(a) Issuance.--Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall issue guidelines for the implementation of this subarticle.(b) Limitation.--The department may not add requirements to the guidelines beyond what is required under 26 U.S.C. § 25F (relating to qualified elementary and secondary education scholarships).(c) Notice.--The department shall transmit the guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication as a statement of policy in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and shall post the guidelines on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Construction.--(1) Except as authorized in this section, the department may not impose any other requirements on, or require other information to be provided by, qualified scholarship organizations.(2) A scholarship from any scholarship organization qualified by the department under this section that is received by an eligible student shall not be considered to be taxable income for the purposes of Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(3) A scholarship from any scholarship organization qualified by the department under this section that is 20260HB2623PN3584 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received by an eligible student shall not constitute an appropriation or financial assistance to the school attended by the recipient.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2623PN3584 - 30 - 1234